Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201859-1403.05
Act, how construed.

Nothing in the Music Licensing Agency Act may be construed to prohibit a music licensing agency from conducting an investigation to determine the existence of music use by a proprietor's business or informing a proprietor of the proprietor's obligations under the copyright laws of the United States pursuant to 17 U.S.C. 101 et seq., as such sections existed on January 1, 2018.

Laws 2018, LB1120, § 37.
July 19, 2018